Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1428
Independent expenditure, defined.

Independent expenditure shall mean an expenditure as defined in section 49-1419 by a person if the expenditure is not made at the direction of, under the control of, or with the cooperation of another person and if the expenditure is not a contribution to a committee.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 28;

Laws 1997, LB 420, § 16.